New York, session 2025-2026, S5288.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Rule 2101 of the civil practice law and rules is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision (h) to read as follows: 3 (h) Exhibits. Every exhibit shall be clearly identified, but no 4 specific method of labeling shall be required. The rejection of any 5 submission shall not be solely based on the mislabeling of any exhibit. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05240-01-5